Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-6509
Key employer, defined.

Key employer means a taxpayer that:

(1) Employs at least one thousand equivalent employees in Nebraska during the base year;

(2) Offers all full-time employees, as defined and described in section 4980H of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, the opportunity to enroll in minimum essential coverage under an eligible employer-sponsored plan, as those terms are defined and described in section 5000A of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended;

(3) Offers all full-time employees, as defined and described in section 4980H of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, a sufficient package of benefits as specified in the ImagiNE Nebraska Act;

(4) Enforces a company policy against any discrimination that is prohibited by federal or state law;

(5) Electronically verifies the work eligibility status of all new employees employed in Nebraska within ninety days after the date of hire during the entire performance period;

(6) Has gone through a change in ownership and control within the twenty-four months immediately prior to the application;

(7) Is at risk of moving more than one thousand existing equivalent employees from the state, as determined by the director;

(8) Retains at least ninety percent of its equivalent base-year employment; and

(9) Is a qualified business.

Laws 2020, LB1107, § 52.

ImagiNE Nebraska Act, see section 77-6801.